Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 2. Referendum.

Collateral references. —

42 Am. Jur. 2d, Initiative and Referendum, § 1 et seq.

82 C.J.S., Statutes, §§ 108-144.

Right of signer of petition or remonstrance to withdraw therefrom or revoke withdrawal, and time therefor. 27 ALR2d 604.

Sec. 15.45.250.
Provision and scope of use of referendum.

The people may approve or reject acts of the legislature by referendum. However, a referendum may not be applied to dedication of revenue, to an appropriation, to local or special legislation, or to laws necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety.

History.

(§ 9.31 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 10 ch 33 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For constitutional restrictions on the subject matter of initiative and referendum, see Alaska Const., art. XI, § 7.

Sec. 15.45.260.
Filing application.

A referendum is proposed by filing an application with the lieutenant governor.
A deposit of $100 must accompany the application.
This deposit shall be retained if a petition is not properly filed.
If a petition is properly filed, the deposit shall be refunded.

History.

(§ 9.32 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 23 ch 125 SLA 1962)

Sec. 15.45.270.
Form of application.

The application must include

the act to be referred;

a statement of approval or rejection;

the printed name, the signature, the address, and a numerical identifier of not fewer than 100 qualified voters who will serve as sponsors; each signature page must include a statement that the sponsors are qualified voters who signed the application with the act to be referred and the statement of approval or rejection attached; and

the designation of a referendum committee consisting of three of the sponsors who subscribed to the application and represent all sponsors and subscribers in matters relating to the referendum; the designation must include the name, mailing address, and signature of each committee member.

History.

(§ 9.33 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 38 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Opinions of attorney general. —

The state legislature has interpreted and implemented Alaska Constitution, art. XI, § 2, passing this section requiring the application for a referendum petition to include the act to be referred. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 17.

The application for referendum petition relating to borough legislation was not in proper form, and it was necessary for the proponents of the measure to prepare an application containing the text of ch. 52, SLA 1963, and secure the necessary number of signatures to this application before they could validly prepare a petition for circulation under § 3, art. XI, of the Alaska Constitution. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 17.

Sec. 15.45.280.
Manner of notice.

Notice to the referendum committee on any matter pertaining to the application and petition may be served on any member of the committee in person or by mail addressed to a committee member as indicated on the application.

History.

(§ 9.34 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.45.290.
Designation of sponsors.

The qualified voters who subscribe to the application in support of the referendum are designated as sponsors. The referendum committee may designate additional sponsors by giving notice to the lieutenant governor of the names, addresses, and numerical identifiers of those so designated.

History.

(§ 9.35 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 39 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 15.45.300.
Time of review of application for certification.

Within seven calendar days after the date the application is received, the lieutenant governor shall review the application and shall either certify it or notify the referendum committee of the grounds for denial.

History.

(§ 9.36 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 178 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.45.310.
Bases of denial of certification.

The lieutenant governor shall deny certification upon determining that

the application is not substantially in the required form;

there is an insufficient number of qualified sponsors; or

more than 90 days have expired since the adjournment of the legislative session at which the act being referred was passed.

History.

(§ 9.37 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.45.320.
Preparation of petition.

The lieutenant governor shall prepare a sufficient number of sequentially numbered petitions to allow full circulation throughout the state. Each petition must contain

a copy of the act to be referred if the number of words included in both the formal and substantive provisions of the act is 500 or less;

the statement of approval or rejection;

a statement of minimum costs to the state associated with certification of the referendum application and review of the referendum petition, excluding legal costs to the state and the costs to the state of any challenge to the validity of the petition;

an estimate of the cost to the state of voter approval or rejection of the act;

an impartial summary of the subject matter of the act;

the statement of warning prescribed in AS

15.45.330

;

sufficient space for the printed name, a numerical identifier, the signature, the date of signature, and the address of each person signing the petition; and

other specifications prescribed by the lieutenant governor to ensure proper handling and control.

Upon request of the referendum committee, the lieutenant governor shall report to the committee the number of persons who voted in the preceding general election.

History.

(§ 9.38 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 40 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 15.45.330.
Statement of warning.

Each petition shall include a statement of warning that a person who signs a name other than the person’s own to the petition, or who knowingly signs more than once for the same proposition at one election, or who signs the petition when knowingly not a qualified voter is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 9.39 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 179 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 15.45.335.
Qualifications of circulator.

To circulate a petition booklet, a person shall be

a citizen of the United States;

18 years of age or older; and

a resident of the state as determined under AS

15.05.020

.

History.

(§ 41 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 15.45.340.
Circulation; prohibitions.

The petitions may be circulated throughout the state only in person.

A circulator may not receive payment or agree to receive payment that is greater than $1 a signature, and a person or an organization may not pay or agree to pay an amount that is greater than $1 a signature, for the collection of signatures on a petition.

A person or organization may not knowingly pay, offer to pay, or cause to be paid money or other valuable thing to a person to sign or refrain from signing a petition.

A person or organization that violates (b) or (c) of this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

In this section,

“organization” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“other valuable thing” has the meaning given in AS

15.56.030

;

“person” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 9.40 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 67 ch 82 SLA 2000; am § 42 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 15.45.350.
Manner of signing and withdrawing name from petition.

Any qualified voter may subscribe to the petition by printing the voter’s name, a numerical identifier, and an address, by signing the voter’s name, and by dating the signature. A person who has signed the referendum petition may withdraw the person’s name only by giving written notice to the lieutenant governor before the date the petition is filed.

History.

(§ 9.41 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 43 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 15.45.360.
Certification of circulator.

Before being filed, each petition shall be certified by an affidavit by the person who personally circulated the petition. In determining the sufficiency of the petition, the lieutenant governor may not count subscriptions on petitions not properly certified at the time of filing or corrected before the subscriptions are counted. The affidavit must state in substance

that the person signing the affidavit meets the residency, age, and citizenship qualifications for circulating a petition under AS

15.45.335

;

that the person is the only circulator of that petition;

that the signatures were made in the circulator’s actual presence;

that, to the best of the circulator’s knowledge, the signatures are the signatures of the persons whose names they purport to be;

that, to the best of the circulator’s knowledge, the signatures are of persons who were qualified voters on the date of signature;

that the circulator has not entered into an agreement with a person or organization in violation of AS

15.45.340(b)

;

that the circulator has not violated AS

15.45.340(c)

with respect to that petition; and

whether the circulator has received payment or agreed to receive payment for the collection of signatures on the petition, and, if so, the name of each person or organization that has paid or agreed to pay the circulator for collection of signatures on the petition.

History.

(§ 9.42 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 68 ch 82 SLA 2000; am § 44 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 15.45.370.
Filing of petition.

The sponsors may file the petition

only if it is signed by qualified voters

only within 90 days after the adjournment of the legislative session at which the act was passed; and

equal in number to 10 percent of those who voted in the preceding general election;

resident in at least three-fourths of the house districts of the state; and

who, in each of the house districts described in (B) of this paragraph, are equal in number to at least seven percent of those who voted in the preceding general election in the house district.

History.

(§ 9.43 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 57 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 148 SLA 2004)

Sec. 15.45.380.
Review of petition.

Within not more than 60 days of the date the petition was filed, the lieutenant governor shall review the petition and shall notify the committee whether the petition was properly or was improperly filed and at which election the proposition shall be placed on the ballot.

History.

(§ 9.44 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.45.390.
Bases for determining the petition was improperly filed.

The lieutenant governor shall notify the committee that the petition was improperly filed upon determining that

there is an insufficient number of qualified subscribers;

the subscribers were not resident in at least three-fourths of the house districts of the state;

there is an insufficient number of qualified subscribers from each of the house districts described in (2) of this section; or

the petition was not filed within 90 days after the adjournment of the legislative session at which the act was passed.

History.

(§ 9.45 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 58 ch 21 SLA 2000; am § 23 ch 41 SLA 2009)

Sec. 15.45.400.
Submission of supplementary petition.

Upon receipt of notice that the filing of the petition was improper, the committee may amend and correct the petition by circulating and filing a supplementary petition within 10 days of the date that notice was given if 90 days have not expired after the adjournment of the legislative session at which the act was passed.

History.

(§ 9.46 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.45.410.
Preparation of ballot title and proposition.

The lieutenant governor, with the assistance of the attorney general, shall prepare a ballot title and proposition upon determining that the petition is properly filed. The ballot title shall, in not more than 25 words, indicate the general subject area of the act. The proposition shall, in not more than 50 words for each section, give a true and impartial summary of the act being referred. In this subsection, “section” means each section of the Alaska Statutes created, amended, or repealed in the Act, and each section of the Act that does not create or amend codified law.

The proposition prepared under (a) of this section shall comply with AS

15.80.005

and shall be worded so that a “Yes” vote on the proposition is a vote to reject the act referred.

History.

(§ 9.47 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 104 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 38 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in subsection (b), “AS

15.80.005

” was substituted for “AS

15.60.005

” to reflect the 2010 renumbering of AS

15.60.005

.

Sec. 15.45.420.
Placing proposition on ballot.

The lieutenant governor shall direct the director to place the ballot title and proposition on the election ballot for the first statewide general, special, special primary, or primary election held more than 180 days after adjournment of the legislative session at which the act was passed.

History.

(§ 9.48 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 36 ch 69 SLA 1970; am § 180 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 37 ch 73 SLA 2013; § 62, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure 2)

Cross references. —

For findings and intent for the 2020 [effective in 2021] changes to this section, see sec. 1 of 2020 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective January 1, 2014, inserted “special runoff,” preceding “or primary election”.

The 2020 amendment, effective February 28, 2021, substituted “special primary” for “special runoff” preceding “, or primary election”.

Editor's notes. —

Section 73, 2020 General Election Ballot Measure No. 2, part of the initiative that amended this section, provides that “[t]he provisions of this act are independent and severable. If any provision of this act, or the applicability of any provision to any person or circumstance, shall be held to be invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this act shall not be affected and shall be given effect to the fullest extent possible.”

Sec. 15.45.430.
Display of act being referred.

The director shall provide each election board with at least five copies of the act being referred, and the election board shall display at least one copy of the act in a conspicuous place in the room where the election is held.

History.

(§ 9.49 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 181 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 45 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Sec. 15.45.440.
Rejection of act.

If a majority of the votes cast on the referendum proposition favor the rejection of the act referred, the act is rejected, and the lieutenant governor shall so certify.
The act rejected by referendum is void 30 days after certification.

History.

(§ 9.50 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.45.450.
Insufficiency of application or petition.

A referendum submitted to the voters may not be held void because of the insufficiency of the application or petition by which the submission was procured.

History.

(§ 9.51 ch 83 SLA 1960)

Sec. 15.45.460.
Judicial review.

Any person aggrieved by any determination made by the lieutenant governor under AS

15.45.250

—

15.45.450

may bring an action in the superior court to have the determination reviewed within 30 days of the date on which notice of the determination was given.

History.

(§ 9.52 ch 83 SLA 1960; am § 182 ch 100 SLA 1980)

Sec. 15.45.465.
Delegation by lieutenant governor.

The lieutenant governor may delegate the duties imposed upon the lieutenant governor by AS

15.45.250

—

15.45.460

to the director.

History.

(§ 183 ch 100 SLA 1980)